Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.125

Liabilities incurred in excess of budget.

Liabilities incurred by any officer or employee of the city or town in excess of any budget appropriations shall not be a liability of the city or town. The clerk shall issue no warrant and the city or town legislative body or other authorized person shall approve no claim for an expenditure in excess of the total amount appropriated for any individual fund, except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction or for emergencies as provided in this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 18.]